Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-306
Capital stock; amount; articles of incorporation; filing fees.

The capital stock of an association is not limited and shall consist of the aggregate of payments made by its members and dividends credited thereon, less withdrawals, and shall be represented by shares. It shall not be necessary for any association organized in and operating under the laws of the State of Nebraska to state in its articles of incorporation, or an amendment or amendments thereto, any amount of authorized capital stock. Upon the filing of articles of incorporation, or an amendment or amendments thereto, an association shall pay a filing fee of twenty-five dollars to the Secretary of State.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 2, p. 724;

C.S.1922, § 8084;

C.S.1929, § 8-302;

Laws 1937, c. 19, § 1, p. 126;

C.S.Supp., 1941, § 8-302;

R.S.1943, § 8-306;

Laws 1953, c. 10, § 1, p. 75.

Under prior law, law required building and loan association to file articles with Secretary of State and pay filing fee in advance based upon authorized capital stock. State ex rel. Equitable Bldg. L. & S. Assn. v. Amsberry, 104 Neb. 843, 178 N.W. 828 (1920).